Connecticut, session 2026, SB00452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 26-25c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No person, nonprofit organization, firm or corporation, including
the state and its political subdivisions, shall knowingly release, organize
the release of or intentionally cause to be released into the atmosphere
[within a twenty-four-hour period ten or more] any helium or other
lighter-than-air gas [balloons] filled balloon in the state.
(b) Any violation of [subsection (a) of] this section shall be an
infraction.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after January 1,
2027, any retailer that sells or offers for sale any helium or other lighter-
than-air gas filled balloon in the state to any consumer shall not provide
such filled balloon to a consumer unless a weight is attached to such
filled balloon that is sufficient to prevent such filled balloon from rising
into the atmosphere.
(b) Any retailer who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this

Substitute Senate Bill No. 452
section shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Department of
Consumer Protection in the amount of twenty dollars per violation.
(c) For purposes of this section, "retailer" means any firm,
partnership, association or corporation that utilizes universal product
coding in totaling a retailer customer's purchase. "Retailer" does not
include any carnival, as defined in section 29-133 of the general statutes.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-90 2 of 2